Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414.01
Repealed. Laws 2012, LB817, § 21. Operative date January 1, 2014. Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center; planning, construction, and equipping; Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; duties.

The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall cause plans, working drawings, and specifications to be prepared for the planning, construction, and equipping of a Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center. The commission may contract with architects and draftsmen for the preparation of such plans, working drawings, and specifications, and may contract in the name of the State of Nebraska for the securing of such services.

Laws 1978, LB 877, § 1.